Missouri, session 2026, SB915.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 379, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
six new sections, to be known as sections 379.2000, 379.2005,
379.2010, 379.2015, 379.2020, and 379.2025, to read as follows:
379.2000. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Delivery Network Company Insurance
Act".
379.2005. For the purposes of sections 379.2000 to
379.2025, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Delivery availability period", the period when a
delivery network company driver:
(a) Has logged on to a digital network and is eligible
to receive requests to provide delivery services from a
delivery network company;
(b) Is operating a personal vehicle; and
(c) Is not providing delivery services or operating in
the delivery service period;
(2) "Delivery network company", an entity that:
(a) Is a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or other entity;
(b) Operates in this state; and

SB 915 2
(c) Uses a digital network to connect a delivery
network company customer to a delivery network company
driver to provide delivery services;
(3) "Delivery network company customer", a person who:
(a) Orders the delivery of goods; and
(b) Directs the delivery network company driver as to
the delivery location for the goods;
(4) "Delivery network company driver", an individual
who provides delivery services through a delivery network
company's digital network using a personal vehicle. A
delivery network company driver is an independent contractor
and not an employee of a delivery network company for all
purposes;
(5) "Delivery service period", the period that:
(a) Begins when a delivery network company driver
starts operating a personal vehicle en route to pick up
goods for a delivery or series of deliveries as documented
through a digital network controlled by a delivery network
company;
(b) Continues while the delivery network company
driver transports the requested delivery or deliveries; and
(c) Ends upon delivery of the requested goods to:
a. The location designated by the delivery network
company customer or the location designated by the last
delivery network company customer in a series of deliveries;
or
b. A location designated by the delivery network
company, including for purposes of returning the goods;
(6) "Delivery services", the fulfillment of delivery
requests made by a delivery network company customer through
a digital network, including the pickup of any goods by the
delivery network company driver and the delivery of the

SB 915 3
goods to the location designated by the delivery network
company customer. The term "delivery services" may include
a series of deliveries to the designated locations of
different delivery network company customers;
(7) "Digital network", any online application,
software, website, or system offered or utilized by a
delivery network company that enables deliveries with
delivery network company drivers;
(8) "Personal vehicle", a motor vehicle that is:
(a) Used by a delivery network company driver to
provide delivery services through a digital network; and
(b) Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by
the delivery network company driver.
379.2010. 1. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 do not
limit the scope of federal or state law regarding delivery
or transport of goods.
2. A delivery made under sections 379.2000 to 379.2025
that is subject to any other law shall comply with the
requirements of that law.
3. If a conflict between sections 379.2000 to 379.2025
and another law dealing with the delivery or transport of
goods arises, the other law prevails.
379.2015. 1. A delivery network company shall ensure
that, during the delivery availability period, if
applicable, and during the delivery service period, primary
motor vehicle liability insurance is in effect that:
(1) Recognizes that the operator of the motor vehicle
is a delivery network company driver; or
(2) Does not exclude coverage for use of a personal
vehicle to provide deliveries.
2. During the delivery service period and the delivery
availability period, the delivery network company driver or

SB 915 4
delivery network company, or any combination of the two,
shall maintain motor vehicle liability insurance coverage
that insures the delivery network company driver for
liability to third parties of not less than:
(1) Fifty thousand dollars for damages arising out of
bodily injury sustained by any one person in an accident;
(2) One hundred thousand dollars for damages arising
out of bodily injury sustained by all persons injured in an
accident; and
(3) Twenty-five thousand dollars for all damages
arising out of damage to or destruction of property in an
accident.
3. If the insurance coverage maintained by a delivery
network company driver under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section has lapsed or does not provide the required motor
vehicle liability insurance coverage, the following
requirements shall apply:
(1) The insurance coverage maintained by the delivery
network company shall provide the motor vehicle liability
insurance coverage required by subsections 1 and 2 of this
section beginning with the first one dollar of a claim; and
(2) The insurance coverage maintained by the delivery
network company shall provide that the motor vehicle
liability insurer has the duty to defend the claim.
4. Coverage under a motor vehicle liability insurance
policy maintained by the delivery network company is not
dependent upon another motor vehicle liability insurer first
denying a claim, nor shall another motor vehicle liability
insurance policy be required to first deny a claim.
5. Insurance coverage required by this section may be
obtained from an insurance company licensed to transact

SB 915 5
business under the insurance laws of this state or by an
eligible surplus lines insurer under chapter 384.
6. The coverage required under subsections 1 and 2 of
this section shall be deemed to satisfy the motor vehicle
financial responsibility requirements for a motor vehicle
under chapter 303.
7. (1) A delivery network company driver shall carry
proof of insurance required under subsections 1 and 2 of
this section at all times while using a personal vehicle in
connection with a digital network.
(2) In the event of an accident, a delivery network
company driver shall, upon request:
(a) Provide insurance coverage information to the
directly interested parties, insurers, and investigating law
enforcement officers; and
(b) Disclose to the directly interested parties,
insurers, and investigating law enforcement officers whether
the delivery network company driver was operating during the
delivery availability period or the delivery service period
at the time of the accident.
(3) The insurance coverage information required in
section 303.024 may be displayed or provided in either paper
or electronic format.
8. (1) In a claims coverage investigation, a delivery
network company or an insurer of the delivery network
company shall:
(a) Cooperate with all insurers that are involved in
the claims coverage investigation to facilitate the exchange
of information; and
(b) Upon request by directly involved parties or an
insurer of directly involved parties, immediately provide
the times that a delivery network company driver began and

SB 915 6
ended the delivery availability period and the delivery
service period on the delivery network company's digital
network in:
a. The twelve-hour period immediately preceding the
accident; and
b. The twelve-hour period immediately following the
accident.
(2) An insurer potentially providing the coverage
required in this section shall disclose upon request by any
other insurer involved in the particular claim a clear
description of the applicable coverage, exclusions, and
limits provided under any motor vehicle liability insurance
policies maintained in order to satisfy the requirements of
this section.
9. An insurer of a delivery network company providing
coverage under subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall
assume primary liability for a claim when:
(1) A dispute exists as to when the delivery
availability period or the delivery service period began or
ended; and
(2) The delivery network company does not have
available, did not retain, or fails to provide the
information required in subsection 7 of this section.
10. A delivery network company shall not be deemed to
control, direct, or manage a personal vehicle or delivery
network company driver who connects to the delivery network
100 company's digital network except if agreed to by written
101 contract.
379.2020. A delivery network company shall not permit
a delivery network company driver to engage in delivery
services on the delivery network company's digital network

SB 915 7
until the delivery network company discloses in writing to
the delivery network company driver:
(1) The insurance coverage, including, but not limited
to, the types of coverage and the limits for each coverage,
that the delivery network company provides while the
delivery network company driver uses a personal vehicle in
connection with a delivery network company's digital
network; and
(2) That the delivery network company driver's own
motor vehicle liability insurance policy may not provide any
insurance coverage during the delivery availability period,
if applicable, or the delivery service period.
379.2025. 1. An insurer that is licensed to write
motor vehicle liability insurance in this state may exclude
coverage and deny the duty to defend or indemnify for a
claim of injury or loss that occurs during the delivery
availability period and the delivery service period.
2. The right to exclude all coverage under subsection
1 of this section may apply to any coverage included in the
motor vehicle liability insurance policy including, but not
limited to:
(1) Liability coverage for bodily injury and property
damage;
(2) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;
(3) Medical payments coverage;
(4) Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
(5) Collision physical damage coverage.
3. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 do not:
(1) Invalidate or limit an exclusion contained in a
motor vehicle liability insurance policy, including any
insurance policy in use or approved for use that excludes

SB 915 8
coverage for motor vehicles used for delivery or for any
business use; or
(2) Invalidate, limit, or restrict an insurer's
ability under existing law to:
(a) Underwrite any insurance policy; or
(b) Cancel and nonrenew an insurance policy.
4. A motor vehicle liability insurer that defends or
indemnifies a claim against a delivery network company
driver that is excluded under the terms of its insurance
policy may seek recovery against the insurer providing
insurance coverage under subsections 1 and 2 of section
379.2015 if the claim:
(1) Occurs during the delivery availability period or
the delivery service period; and
(2) Is excluded under the terms of its insurance
policy.
Section B. The enactment of section A of this act
shall become effective on October 1, 2027.
✓